Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8919
License; expiration; renewal.

A veterinary drug distributor license shall expire on July 1 of each odd-numbered year and may be renewed. The license shall not be transferable. The department shall mail an application for renewal to each licensee not later than May 15 of the year the license expires. If an application for renewal is received from the licensee after July 1, the department may impose a late fee and shall refuse to issue the license until such late fee and renewal fee are paid. Failure to receive an application for renewal shall not relieve the licensee from the late fee imposed by this section.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 19.
December 1, 2008